North Carolina, session 2025, HB616.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 11.11 of S.L. 2022-74, as amended by Section 11.11 of S.L.
2023-134, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 11.11.(a) Purpose. – It is in the best economic and developmental interests of
the State to support the development of megasites to ensure the State's ongoing competitiveness
for major manufacturing opportunities, including, but not limited to, the aerospace, automotive,
clean energy, food processing, semiconductor, and life science industries. The purpose of this
section is to establish a competitive grant program serving to do the following:
(1) Identify and evaluate up to seven megasites for preferred development and
marketing.
(2) Assist local governments or a partnership of local governments in the
acquisition of a newly identified or existing megasite.
(3) Support local governments or a partnership of local governments to analyze,
plan, install, or upgrade public infrastructure, including publicly owned water,
gas, and sewer systems, transportation infrastructure, and the electrical utility
lines electric infrastructure necessary to meet the needs of prospective
employers for megasites.
(4) Support local governments or a partnership of local governments to fund
on-site preparation, including clearing, grading, or other related expenses for
megasites.
(4a) Support local governments or a partnership of local governments in
conducting due diligence, including, but not limited to, the following: site
characteristics, preliminary engineering reports for water and wastewater
provision to the site, assessments related to road and highway infrastructure
to serve the site, and other assessments as needed.
(5) Facilitate coordination between the economic development entities, the North
Carolina Department of Environmental Quality, and the North Carolina
Department of Transportation to expedite needs related to timely site
development.
…
"SECTION 11.11.(c) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
…
*H616-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Government partnership. – Either (i) a North Carolina nonprofit entity that is
tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(12) of the Internal Revenue
Code in partnership with one or more local governments or (ii) a group of
local governments.
…
"SECTION 11.11.(d) Allocation. – EDPNC shall allocate monies in the Fund on the
following basis:
…
(2) All other funds appropriated to the Fund for local government grants for the
acquisition of megasites determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection. purposes described in subsection (a) of this section. A grant for
the acquisition of a megasite is limited to eighty-five percent (85%) of the
lesser of the property's purchase price or tax value. The percentage actually
provided in the grant shall be determined by EDPNC based on total
development needs for the megasite, prior investment in the megasite by one
or more local governments, the ability of one or more local governments to
invest in the megasite, and the ability and level of participation promised by
the local government in exchange for a grant from the Fund. Monies may only
be granted for, and used to acquire, a megasite for which (i) one or more local
governments have a binding option or offer to purchase and (ii) all basic due
diligence must be complete, including, but not limited to, boundary surveys,
title searches, State Historic Preservation Office reviews, and wetlands
delineation.
…
"SECTION 11.11.(f) Agreements Required. – Monies may be disbursed from the Fund
previously appropriated for the Megasite Readiness Program shall be transferred in full to
EDPNC when this act becomes law. Funds subsequently appropriated for the Program shall be
transferred in full to EDPNC once such an act becomes law. EDPNC may use funds only in
accordance with agreements that are (i) entered into between EDPNC and a local government or
a government partnership and (ii) approved by the Economic Investment Committee established
pursuant to G.S. 143B-437.54. The agreement must include all of the performance criteria,
remedies, and other safeguards required to secure the assistance provided to ready the megasite
for a major employer and must require EDPNC to recapture a proportionate amount of assistance
provided under this section for failure by a local government or government partnership to meet
and maintain the megasite for availability for the purposes for which the assistance was provided.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) Section 11.12 of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 11.12.(a) Funds appropriated by Section 11.4 11.4(d)(1) of S.L. 2022-74 to the
Department of Commerce (Department) and allocated to the nonprofit corporation with which
the Department contracts pursuant to G.S. 143B-431.01(b) that remain unspent as of June 30,
2023, April 1, 2025, shall be transferred to the North Carolina Selectsite Fund established in
subsection (c) of this section to be used for purposes consistent with subdivision (e)(1) of this
section. Of the funds appropriated from the Economic Development Project Reserve established
in Section 2.2 of this act to the Department to be allocated to the nonprofit corporation with which
the Department contracts pursuant to G.S. 143B-431.01(b), the sum of ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2024-2025 fiscal year shall be used to support local
governments or a partnership of local governments in conducting due diligence as described in
subdivision for the purposes described in subdivisions (b)(2), (b)(3), (b)(4), and (b)(5) of this
section.
"SECTION 11.12.(b) Purpose. – It is in the best economic and developmental interests of
the State to support the development of selectsites to ensure the State's ongoing competitiveness
Page 2 House Bill 616-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
for major manufacturing opportunities, including, but not limited to, the aerospace, automotive,
clean energy, food processing, semiconductor, and life science industries. The purpose of this
section is to establish a competitive grant program serving to do the following:
(1) Identify and evaluate up to 15 20 selectsites of less than 1,000 acres for
preferred development and marketing.
(2) Assist local governments or a partnership of local governments in the
acquisition of a newly identified or existing selectsite.
(3) Support local governments or a partnership of local governments to analyze,
plan, install, or upgrade public infrastructure, including publicly owned water,
gas, and sewer systems; transportation infrastructure; and the electrical utility
lines electric infrastructure necessary to meet the needs of prospective
employers for selectsites.
(4) Support local governments or a partnership of local governments to fund
on-site preparation, including clearing, grading, or other related expenses for
selectsites.
(5) Support local governments or a partnership of local governments in
conducting due diligence, including, but not limited to, the following: site
characteristics, preliminary engineering reports for water and wastewater
provision to the site, assessments related to road and highway infrastructure
to serve the site, and other assessments as needed.
(6) Facilitate coordination between the economic development entities and the
North Carolina Department of Environmental Quality and the North Carolina
Department of Transportation to expedite needs related to timely site
development.
…
"SECTION 11.12.(e) Allocation. – EDPNC shall allocate monies in the Fund on the
following basis:
(1) Unspent funds transferred pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be
used for engaging a national site selection firm through a competitive bid
process to produce a report identifying and evaluating 15 selectsites for
preferred development and marketing, of which seven must be less than 500
acres and of which an additional two must be less than 100 acres. Further
unspent funds transferred pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be
used for engaging a national site selection firm through a competitive bid
process to produce a supplemental report identifying and evaluating up to five,
and no less than three, additional selectsites from the initial disaster declared
counties resulting from Tropical Storm Helene.
(2) Funds appropriated to the Fund for local government grants shall be allocated
for the purposes outlined in subdivisions (b)(2), (b)(3), (b)(4), and (b)(5) of
this section for selectsites determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection. EDPNC shall prioritize local government grants that have the
greatest potential to reduce the time for site readiness and reduce the risk of
unforeseen conditions that could affect the site viability for advanced
manufacturing projects. EDPNC shall base the grant amount on total
development needs for the selectsite, prior investment in the selectsite by one
or more local governments, the ability of one or more local governments to
invest in the selectsite, and the ability and level of participation promised by
the local government in exchange for a grant from the Fund. Monies may only
be granted for, and used to acquire, a selectsite for which (i) one or more local
governments have a binding option or offer to purchase and (ii) all basic due
diligence has been completed, including, but not limited to, boundary surveys,
House Bill 616-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
title searches, State Historic Preservation Office reviews, and wetlands
delineation.
(3) Of the monies available in the fund, no more than $150,000 shall be used
biennially for engaging a national site selection firm through a competitive
bid process to produce a report identifying and evaluating seven new
selectsites for preferred development and marketing, of which three must be
less than 500 acres and of which an additional two must be less than 100 acres.
Geographic diversity must be a priority consideration in the identification of
new sites beginning with the report due in 2026.
…
"SECTION 11.12.(g) Agreements Required. – Monies may be disbursed from the Fund
previously appropriated for the Selectsite Readiness Program shall be transferred in full to
EDPNC when this act becomes law. Funds subsequently appropriated for the Program shall be
transferred in full to EDPNC once such an act becomes law. EDPNC may use funds only in
accordance with agreements entered into between EDPNC and a local government or a
government partnership. The agreement must include all of the performance criteria, remedies,
and other safeguards required to secure the assistance provided to ready the selectsite for a major
employer and must require EDPNC to recapture a proportionate amount of assistance provided
under this section for failure by a local government or government partnership to meet and
maintain the selectsite for availability for the purposes for which the assistance was provided.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 4 House Bill 616-Third Edition